West Virginia, session 2026, SB1077.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION. §18-5-55.  Protection of vocational education agriculture programs. (a) The Legislature finds that agriculture offers many benefits to the state and its individual citizens such as enhanced self-sufficiency, additional food security, contributions to the economy, and the enjoyment and satisfaction that can be experienced from various forms of agriculture.(b) Vocational education agriculture programs shall be offered to all students, and these programs may only be terminated if the enrollment is the lowest enrollment of all vocational education programs. If a county school district terminates its program, the county school district shall submit a report to the Legislative Oversight Commission on Education Accountability explaining the reasoning for terminating its program. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home